California statutes. Labor Code
The Labor Commissioner may issue to a person eligible therefor a certificate of convenience to conduct the business of a talent agency where the person licensed to conduct such talent agency business has died or has had a conservator of the estate appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction. Such a certificate of convenience may be denominated an estate certificate of convenience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.20b.

To be eligible for a certificate of convenience, a person shall be either:

(a) The executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased person licensed to conduct the business of a talent agency.

(b) If no executor or administrator has been appointed, the surviving spouse or heir otherwise entitled to conduct the business of such deceased licensee.

(c) The conservator of the estate of a person licensed to conduct the business of a talent agency.

Such estate certificate of convenience shall continue in force for a period of not to exceed 90 days, and shall be renewable for such period as the Labor Commissioner may deem appropriate, pending the disposal of the talent agency license or the procurement of a new license under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.21.

The Labor Commissioner may revoke or suspend any license when it is shown that any of the following occur:

(a) The licensee or his or her agent has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The licensee has ceased to be of good moral character.

(c) The conditions under which the license was issued have changed or no longer exist.

(d) The licensee has made any material misrepresentation or false statement in his or her application for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.22.

Before revoking or suspending any license, the Labor Commissioner shall afford the holder of such license an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Operation and Management [1700.23. - 1700.47.]

1700.23.

Every talent agency shall submit to the Labor Commissioner a form or forms of contract to be utilized by such talent agency in entering into written contracts with artists for the employment of the services of such talent agency by such artists, and secure the approval of the Labor Commissioner thereof. Such approval shall not be withheld as to any proposed form of contract unless such proposed form of contract is unfair, unjust and oppressive to the artist. Each such form of contract, except under the conditions specified in Section 1700.45, shall contain an agreement by the talent agency to refer any controversy between the artist and the talent agency relating to the terms of the contract to the Labor Commissioner for adjustment. There shall be printed on the face of the contract in prominent type the following: “This talent agency is licensed by the Labor Commissioner of the State of California.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.24.

Every talent agency shall file with the Labor Commissioner a schedule of fees to be charged and collected in the conduct of that occupation, and shall also keep a copy of the schedule posted in a conspicuous place in the office of the talent agency. Changes in the schedule may be made from time to time, but no fee or change of fee shall become effective until seven days after the date of filing thereof with the Labor Commissioner and until posted for not less than seven days in a conspicuous place in the office of the talent agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.25.

(a) A licensee who receives any payment of funds on behalf of an artist shall immediately deposit that amount in a trust fund account maintained by him or her in a bank or other recognized depository. The funds, less the licensee’s commission, shall be disbursed to the artist within 30 days after receipt. However, notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the licensee may retain the funds beyond 30 days of receipt in either of the following circumstances:

(1) To the extent necessary to offset an obligation of the artist to the talent agency that is then due and owing.

(2) When the funds are the subject of a controversy pending before the Labor Commissioner under Section 1700.44 concerning a fee alleged to be owed by the artist to the licensee.

(b) A separate record shall be maintained of all funds received on behalf of an artist and the record shall further indicate the disposition of the funds.

(c) If disputed by the artist and the dispute is referred to the Labor Commissioner, the failure of a licensee to disburse funds to an artist within 30 days of receipt shall constitute a “controversy” within the meaning of Section 1700.44.

(d) Any funds specified in subdivision (a) that are the subject of a controversy pending before the Labor Commissioner under Section 1700.44 shall be retained in the trust fund account specified in subdivision (a) and shall not be used by the licensee for any purpose until the controversy is determined by the Labor Commissioner or settled by the parties.

(e) If the Labor Commissioner finds, in proceedings under Section 1700.44, that the licensee’s failure to disburse funds to an artist within the time required by subdivision (a) was a willful violation, the Labor Commissioner may, in addition to other relief under Section 1700.44, order the following:

(1) Award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing artist.

(2) Award interest to the prevailing artist on the funds wrongfully withheld at the rate of 10 percent per annum during the period of the violation.

(f) Nothing in subdivision (c), (d), or (e) shall be deemed to supersede Section 1700.45 or to affect the enforceability of a contractual arbitration provision meeting the criteria of Section 1700.45.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1032, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.26.

Every talent agency shall keep records in a form approved by the Labor Commissioner, in which shall be entered all of the following:

(1) The name and address of each artist employing the talent agency.

(2) The amount of fee received from the artist.

(3) The employments secured by the artist during the term of the contract between the artist and the talent agency, and the amount of compensation received by the artists pursuant thereto.

(4) Any other information which the Labor Commissioner requires.

No talent agency, its agent or employees, shall make any false entry in any records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.27.

All books, records, and other papers kept pursuant to this chapter by any talent agency shall be open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the Labor Commissioner and his agents. Every talent agency shall furnish to the Labor Commissioner upon request a true copy of such books, records, and papers or any portion thereof, and shall make such reports as the Labor Commissioner prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.28.

Every talent agency shall post in a conspicuous place in the office of such talent agency a printed copy of this chapter and of such other statutes as may be specified by the Labor Commissioner. Such copies shall also contain the name and address of the officer charged with the enforcement of this chapter. The Labor Commissioner shall furnish to talent agencies printed copies of any statute required to be posted under the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.29.

The Labor Commissioner may, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing at Section 11370), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt, amend, and repeal such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary for the purpose of enforcing and administering this chapter and as are not inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.30.

No talent agency shall sell, transfer, or give away to any person other than a director, officer, manager, employee, or shareholder of the talent agency any interest in or the right to participate in the profits of the talent agency without the written consent of the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.31.

No talent agency shall knowingly issue a contract for employment containing any term or condition which, if complied with, would be in violation of law, or attempt to fill an order for help to be employed in violation of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.32.

No talent agency shall publish or cause to be published any false, fraudulent, or misleading information, representation, notice, or advertisement. All advertisements of a talent agency by means of cards, circulars, or signs, and in newspapers and other publications, and all letterheads, receipts, and blanks shall be printed and contain the licensed name and address of the talent agency and the words “talent agency.” No talent agency shall give any false information or make any false promises or representations concerning an engagement or employment to any applicant who applies for an engagement or employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.33.

No talent agency shall send or cause to be sent, any artist to any place where the health, safety, or welfare of the artist could be adversely affected, the character of which place the talent agency could have ascertained upon reasonable inquiry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.34.

No talent agency shall send any minor to any saloon or place where intoxicating liquors are sold to be consumed on the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.35.

No talent agency shall knowingly permit any persons of bad character, prostitutes, gamblers, intoxicated persons, or procurers to frequent, or be employed in, the place of business of the talent agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.36.

No talent agency shall accept any application for employment made by or on behalf of any minor, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1286, or shall place or assist in placing any such minor in any employment whatever in violation of Part 4 (commencing with Section 1171).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.37.

A minor cannot disaffirm a contract, otherwise valid, entered into during minority, either during the actual minority of the minor entering into such contract or at any time thereafter, with a duly licensed talent agency as defined in Section 1700.4 to secure him engagements to render artistic or creative services in motion pictures, television, the production of phonograph records, the legitimate or living stage, or otherwise in the entertainment field including, but without being limited to, services as an actor, actress, dancer, musician, comedian, singer, or other performer or entertainer, or as a writer, director, producer, production executive, choreographer, composer, conductor or designer, the blank form of which has been approved by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1700.23, where such contract has been approved by the superior court of the county where such minor resides or is employed.

Such approval may be given by the superior court on the petition of either party to the contract after such reasonable notice to the other party thereto as may be fixed by said court, with opportunity to such other party to appear and be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.38.

No talent agency shall knowingly secure employment for an artist in any place where a strike, lockout, or other labor trouble exists, without notifying the artist of such conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.39.

No talent agency shall divide fees with an employer, an agent or other employee of an employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.40.

(a) No talent agency shall collect a registration fee. In the event that a talent agency shall collect from an artist a fee or expenses for obtaining employment for the artist, and the artist shall fail to procure the employment, or the artist shall fail to be paid for the employment, the talent agency shall, upon demand therefor, repay to the artist the fee and expenses so collected. Unless repayment thereof is made within 48 hours after demand therefor, the talent agency shall pay to the artist an additional sum equal to the amount of the fee.

(b) No talent agency may refer an artist to any person, firm, or corporation in which the talent agency has a direct or indirect financial interest for other services to be rendered to the artist, including, but not limited to, photography, audition tapes, demonstration reels or similar materials, business management, personal management, coaching, dramatic school, casting or talent brochures, agency-client directories, or other printing.

(c) No talent agency may accept any referral fee or similar compensation from any person, association, or corporation providing services of any type expressly set forth in subdivision (b) to an artist under contract with the talent agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.41.

In cases where an artist is sent by a talent agency beyond the limits of the city in which the office of such talent agency is located upon the representation of such talent agency that employment of a particular type will there be available for the artist and the artist does not find such employment available, such talent agency shall reimburse the artist for any actual expenses incurred in going to and returning from the place where the artist has been so sent unless the artist has been otherwise so reimbursed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.44.

(a) In cases of controversy arising under this chapter, the parties involved shall refer the matters in dispute to the Labor Commissioner, who shall hear and determine the same, subject to an appeal within 10 days after determination, to the superior court where the same shall be heard de novo. To stay any award for money, the party aggrieved shall execute a bond approved by the superior court in a sum not exceeding twice the amount of the judgment. In all other cases the bond shall be in a sum of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and approved by the superior court.

The Labor Commissioner may certify without a hearing that there is no controversy within the meaning of this section if he or she has by investigation established that there is no dispute as to the amount of the fee due. Service of the certification shall be made upon all parties concerned by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested and the certification shall become conclusive 10 days after the date of mailing if no objection has been filed with the Labor Commissioner during that period.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, failure of any person to obtain a license from the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered a criminal act under any law of this state.

(c) No action or proceeding shall be brought pursuant to this chapter with respect to any violation which is alleged to have occurred more than one year prior to commencement of the action or proceeding.

(d) It is not unlawful for a person or corporation which is not licensed pursuant to this chapter to act in conjunction with, and at the request of, a licensed talent agency in the negotiation of an employment contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.45.

Notwithstanding Section 1700.44, a provision in a contract providing for the decision by arbitration of any controversy under the contract or as to its existence, validity, construction, performance, nonperformance, breach, operation, continuance, or termination, shall be valid:

(a) If the provision is contained in a contract between a talent agency and a person for whom the talent agency under the contract undertakes to endeavor to secure employment, or

(b) If the provision is inserted in the contract pursuant to any rule, regulation, or contract of a bona fide labor union regulating the relations of its members to a talent agency, and

(c) If the contract provides for reasonable notice to the Labor Commissioner of the time and place of all arbitration hearings, and

(d) If the contract provides that the Labor Commissioner or his or her authorized representative has the right to attend all arbitration hearings.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any arbitration shall be governed by the provisions of Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

If there is an arbitration provision in a contract, the contract need not provide that the talent agency agrees to refer any controversy between the applicant and the talent agency regarding the terms of the contract to the Labor Commissioner for adjustment, and Section 1700.44 shall not apply to controversies pertaining to the contract.

A provision in a contract providing for the decision by arbitration of any controversy arising under this chapter which does not meet the requirements of this section is not made valid by Section 1281 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.47.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee to refuse to represent any artist on account of that artist’s race, color, creed, sex, national origin, religion, or handicap.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Education and Trainings [1700.50. - 1700.54.]

1700.50.

(a) A licensee shall make available via electronic transmission, hard copy brochure, or through other reasonable means educational materials regarding sexual harassment prevention, retaliation, and reporting resources to an adult artist within 90 days of agreeing to representation by the licensee or agency procurement of an engagement, meeting, or interview, whichever comes first.

(b) Sexual harassment educational materials shall include, at a minimum, the components specified in the Civil Rights Department’s Form 185.
 Educational materials may be provided electronically, via
 internet website, or other means.

(c) Educational materials for each artist shall be in the language understood by that artist. The licensee may comply with this language requirement either by making the educational materials available in that language or by having the educational materials presented for the artist in the language that they understand.

(d) The licensee shall keep a record for three years confirming that it has made available educational materials regarding sexual harassment prevention, retaliation, and reporting resources to all adult artists who have been signed for representation after the effective date of
 the act adding this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 66.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.51.

(a) A licensee shall make available educational materials regarding nutrition and eating disorders to an adult model artist within 90 days of the date of agreeing to representation by the licensee or agency procurement of an engagement, meeting, or interview, whichever comes first.

(b) Educational materials regarding nutrition and eating disorders shall
 include, at a minimum, the components specified in the National Institute of Health’s Eating Disorders Internet Web site at www.nimh.nih.gov/health/topics/eating-disorders/index.shtml or a successor Internet Web site.

(c) Educational materials regarding nutrition and eating disorders for each adult model artist shall be in the language understood by
 that artist. The licensee may comply with this language requirement either by making the educational materials available in the artist’s native language or by having the educational materials presented for the artist in the language that he or she understands.

(d) The licensee shall keep a record for three years confirming that it has made available educational materials regarding nutrition and eating disorders to all adult model artists who have been signed for representation after the effective date of the act adding this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.52.

(a) Prior to the issuance of an entertainment work permit to a minor pursuant to Section 1308.5, the parent or legal guardian of a minor between 14 to 17 years of age, inclusive, hereafter “age-eligible minor,” shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that the minor completes training in sexual harassment prevention, retaliation, and reporting resources using the online training course made available on the internet website of the Civil Rights Department pursuant to Section 12950.1 of the Government Code. The minor shall be
 accompanied by a parent or legal guardian for the training.

(2) Certify to the Labor Commissioner that the training has been completed.

(b) Training for each age-eligible minor and their parent or legal guardian shall be in the language understood by that person, whenever reasonably possible.

(c) A licensee shall request and retain a copy of the minor’s entertainment work permit prior to representing or sending a minor artist on an audition, meeting, or interview for engagement of the minor’s services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 67.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.53.

As part of the application for license renewal, in order to establish that the requirements of this article are met, a licensee shall confirm to the Labor Commissioner that it has and will continue to make available educational materials to adult artists in compliance with Sections 1700.50 and 1700.51.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.54.

(a) It is a violation of this article for a licensee to do any of the following: 

(1) Fail to ensure that educational materials are made available to an adult artist.

(2) Fail to make available educational materials in a language understood by the artist. 

(3) Fail to request and retain a minor’s entertainment work permit.

(b) If, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that a violation of any of the provisions listed in subdivision
 (a) has occurred, the Labor Commissioner may assess a civil penalty recoverable by the Labor Commissioner in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. In enforcing this section, the Labor Commissioner shall take into consideration whether the violation was inadvertent, and in his or her discretion, may decide not to penalize the licensee when that violation was due to a clerical error or inadvertent mistake.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Fee-Related Talent Services [1701. - 1705.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1701. - 1701.]

1701.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Artist” means a person who is or seeks to become an actor, actress, model, extra, radio artist, musical artist, musical organization, director, musical director, writer, cinematographer, composer, lyricist, arranger, or other person rendering professional services in motion picture, theatrical, radio, television, Internet, print media, or other entertainment enterprises or technologies.

(b) “Audition” means any activity for the purpose of obtaining employment, compensated or not, as an artist whereby an artist meets with, interviews or performs before, or displays his or her talent before, any person, including a
 producer, a director, or a casting director, or an associate, representative, or designee of a producer, director, or casting director, who has, or is represented to have, input into the decision to select an artist for an employment opportunity. An “audition” may be in-person or through electronic means, live or recorded, and may include a performance or other display of the artist’s promotional materials.

(c) “Employment opportunity” means the opportunity to obtain work as an artist, whether compensated or not.

(d) “Fee” means any money or other valuable consideration paid or promised to be paid by or on behalf of an artist for services rendered or to be rendered by any person conducting business under this chapter. “Fee” does not include the following:

(1) A fee calculated as a
 percentage of the income earned by the artist for his or her employment as an artist.

(2) (A) Reimbursements for out-of-pocket costs actually incurred by the payee on behalf of the artist for services rendered or goods provided to the artist by an independent third party if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The payee has no direct or indirect financial interest in the third party.

(ii) The payee does not accept any referral fee, kickback, or other consideration for referring the artist.

(iii) The services rendered or goods provided for the out-of-pocket costs are not, and are not represented to be, a condition for the payee to register or list the artist
 with the payee.

(iv) The payee maintains adequate records to establish that the amount to be reimbursed was actually advanced or owed to a third party and that the third party is not a person with whom the payee has a direct or indirect financial interest or from whom the payee receives any consideration for referring the artist. To satisfy this condition, the payee shall maintain the records for at least three years and make them available for inspection and copying within 24 hours of a written request by the Labor Commissioner, the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, or a state or local enforcement agency.

(B) A person asserting a defense based upon this paragraph has the burden of producing evidence to support the defense. 

(3) Appearances, marketing, or similar activities by an artist rendered in the context of promoting that artist’s career.

(4) Royalties or profit participation from work or services as an artist payable under a bona fide contractual obligation.

(e) “Person” means an individual, company, society, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, or other organization.

(f) “Talent counseling service” means a person who does not manage or direct the development of an artist’s career and who, for a fee from, or on behalf of, an artist, provides or offers to
 provide, or advertises or represents itself as providing, that artist, directly or by referral to another person, with career counseling, vocational guidance, aptitude testing, or career evaluation as an artist. 

(g) “Talent listing service” means a person who, for a fee from, or on behalf of, an artist, provides or offers to provide, or advertises or represents itself as providing, an artist, directly or by referral to another person, with any of the following:

(1) A list of one or more auditions or employment opportunities.

(2) A list of talent agents or talent managers, including an associate, representative, or designee thereof.

(3) A search, or providing the artist with the ability to perform a self-directed search, of any database for an audition or employment opportunity, or a database of talent agents or talent managers, or an associate, representative, or designee thereof.

(4) Storage or maintenance for distribution or disclosure to a person represented as offering an audition or employment opportunity, or to a talent agent, talent manager, or an associate, representative, or designee of a talent agent or talent manager, of either of the following: (A) an artist’s name, photograph, Internet Web site, filmstrip, videotape, audition tape, demonstration
 reel, résumé, portfolio, or other reproduction or promotional material of the artist or (B) an artist’s schedule of availability for an audition or employment opportunity.

(h) “Talent scout” means an individual employed, appointed, or authorized by a talent service, who solicits or attempts to solicit an artist for the purpose of becoming a client of the service. The principals of a service are themselves talent scouts if they solicit on behalf of the service.

(i) “Talent service” means a talent counseling service, a talent listing service, or a talent training service.

(j) “Talent training service” means a person who, for a fee from, or on behalf of, an artist, provides or offers to provide,
 or advertises or represents itself as providing, an artist, directly or by referral to another person, with lessons, coaching, seminars, workshops, or similar training as an artist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Advance-Fee Talent Representation Service [1702. - 1702.4.]

1702.

No person shall own, operate, or act in the capacity of an advance-fee talent representation service or advertise, solicit for, or knowingly refer a person to, an advance-fee talent representation service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.1.

(a) “Advance-fee talent representation service” means a person who provides or offers to provide, or advertises or represents itself as providing, an artist, directly or by referral to another person, with one or more of the following services described below, provided that the person charges or receives a fee from or on behalf of an artist for photographs, Internet Web sites, or other reproductions or other promotional materials as an artist; lessons, coaching, seminars, workshops, or similar training for an artist; or for one or more of the following services:

(1) Procuring or attempting to procure an employment opportunity or an engagement as an artist.

(2) Procuring or attempting to procure an audition for an artist.

(3) Managing or directing the development of an artist’s career.

(4) Procuring or attempting to procure a talent agent or talent manager, including an associate, representative, or designee of a talent agent or talent manager.

(b) “Advance-fee talent representation service” also means a person who charges or receives a fee from, or on behalf of, an artist for any product or service required for the artist to obtain, from or through the person, any of the services described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.3.

A person who violates Section 1702 is subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1704).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.4.

This article does not apply to the following:

(a) A public educational institution.

(b) A nonprofit corporation, organized to achieve economic adjustment and civic betterment, give vocational guidance, including employment counseling services, and assist in the placement of its members or others, if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) None of the corporation’s directors, officers, or employees receive any compensation other than a nominal salary for services performed for the corporation.

(2) The corporation does not charge a fee for its services, although it may
 request a voluntary contribution.

(3) The corporation uses any membership dues or fees solely for maintenance.

(c) A nonprofit corporation, formed in good faith for the promotion and advancement of the general professional interests of its members, that maintains a placement service principally engaged to secure employment for its members with the state or a county, city, district, or other public agency under contracts providing employment for one year or longer, or with a nonprofit corporation exempted by subdivision (b).

(d) A labor organization, as defined in Section 1117.

(e) A newspaper, bona fide newsletter, magazine, trade or professional journal, or other publication of general circulation, whether in print or on the Internet, that has as its
 main purpose the dissemination of news, reports, trade or professional information, or information not intended to assist in locating, securing, or procuring employment or assignments for others.

(f) A public institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Talent Services [1703. - 1703.6.]

1703.

(a) Every contract and agreement between an artist and a talent service shall be in writing, in at least 10-point type, and contain all of the following provisions:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, fax number (if any), email address (if any), and Internet Web site address (if any), of the talent service, the artist to whom services are to be provided, and the representative executing the contract on behalf of the talent service.

(2) A
 description of the services to be performed, a statement when those services are to be provided, and the duration of the contract.

(3) Evidence of compliance with applicable bonding requirements, including the name of the bonding company and the bond number, if any, and a statement that a bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) must be posted with the Labor Commissioner.

(4) The amount of any fees to be charged to or collected from, or on behalf of, the artist receiving the services, and the date or dates when those fees are required to be paid.

(5) The following statements, in boldface type and in close proximity to the artist’s signature:“(Name of talent service) IS A TALENT COUNSELING SERVICE, TALENT LISTING SERVICE, OR TALENT TRAINING SERVICE (whichever is applicable). THIS IS NOT A TALENT AGENCY CONTRACT. ONLY A TALENT AGENT LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 1700.5 OF THE LABOR CODE MAY ENGAGE IN THE OCCUPATION OF PROCURING, OFFERING, PROMISING, OR ATTEMPTING TO PROCURE EMPLOYMENT OR ENGAGEMENTS FOR AN ARTIST. (Name of talent service) IS PROHIBITED BY LAW FROM OFFERING OR ATTEMPTING TO OBTAIN AUDITIONS OR EMPLOYMENT FOR YOU. IT MAY ONLY PROVIDE YOU WITH TRAINING, COUNSELING, OR LISTING INFORMATION (whichever is applicable). FOR MORE INFORMATION, CONSULT CHAPTER 4.5 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 1701) OF PART 6 OF DIVISION 2 OF THE LABOR CODE. A DISPUTE
 ARISING OUT OF THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT BY THE TALENT SERVICE THAT IS NOT RESOLVED TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ARTIST SHOULD BE REFERRED TO A LOCAL CONSUMER AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT, AS APPROPRIATE.YOUR RIGHT TO CANCEL(enter date of transaction)You may cancel this contract and obtain a full refund, without any penalty or obligation, if notice of cancellation is given, in writing, within 10 business days from the above date or the date on which you commence utilizing the services under the contract, whichever is longer. For purposes of this section, business days are Monday through Friday.To cancel this contract, mail or deliver or send by facsimile transmission a signed and dated copy of the following cancellation notice or any other written notice of cancellation to (name of talent service) at (address of its place of business), fax number (if any), email address (if any), and Internet Web site address (if any), NOT LATER THAN MIDNIGHT OF (date). If the contract was executed in part or in whole through the Internet, you may cancel the contract by sending the notification to: (email address).CANCELLATION NOTICEI hereby cancel this contract.Dated:Artist Signature. If you cancel, all fees you have paid must be refunded to you within 10 business days after delivery of the cancellation notice to the talent service.”(6) A statement conspicuously disclosing whether the artist may or may not obtain a
 refund after the 10-day cancellation period described in paragraph (5) has expired.

(b) Except for contracts executed over the Internet, a contract subject to this section shall be dated and signed by the artist and the representative executing the contract on behalf of the talent service. In the case of a contract executed over the Internet, the talent service shall give the artist clear and conspicuous notice of the contract terms and provide to the artist the ability to acknowledge receipt of the terms before acknowledging agreement thereto. In any dispute regarding compliance with this subdivision, the talent service shall have the burden of proving that the artist received the terms and acknowledged agreement thereto.

(c) If the talent service offers to list or display information
 about an artist, including a photograph, on the service’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application or on a Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application that the talent service has authority to design or alter, the contract shall contain a notice that the talent service will remove the listing and content within 10 days of a request by the artist or, in the case of a minor, the artist’s parent or guardian. The contract shall include a valid telephone number, mailing address, and email address for the talent service to which a request for removal may be made.

(d) A contract between an artist and a talent
 service shall be contained in a single document that includes the elements set forth in this section. A contract subject to this section that does not comply with subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, is voidable at the election of the artist and may be canceled by the artist at any time without any penalty or obligation.
